Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201383-108.04
Department
of Health and Human Services; additional facilities for care of children.

(1) In addition to the institutions established by law, the
Department of Health and Human Services may maintain or use the following
facilities for the care of children in its legal custody who have been adjudged
to be as described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247:
(a) Receiving homes to be used for the temporary care of children; (b) foster
homes; (c) residential child-caring agencies as defined
in section 71-1926; and (d) other facilities and services, including
forestry or conservation camps for the training and treatment of children.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services also may
use other public facilities or contract for the use of private facilities
for the care and treatment of children in its legal custody. Placement of
children in private or public facilities not under its jurisdiction shall
not terminate the legal custody of the department. No state funds may be paid
for care of a child in the home of a parent.

Laws 1967, c. 249, § 1, p. 659;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 21;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 33;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 898;

Laws 2013, LB265, § 49.